Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-292.03
Termination of parental rights; state; Department of Health and Human Services; duties.

(1) Within thirty days after the fifteen-month period under subsection (1) of section 43-292.02, the court shall hold a hearing on the record and shall make a determination on the record as to whether there is an exception under subsection (3) of section 43-292.02 in this particular case. If there is no exception, the state shall proceed as provided in subsection (1) of section 43-292.02.

(2) The Department of Health and Human Services shall submit on a timely basis, to the court in which the petition to place the juvenile in an out-of-home placement was filed and to the county attorney who filed the petition, a list of the name of each juvenile who has been in an out-of-home placement for fifteen or more months of the most recent twenty-two months.

Laws 1998, LB 1041, § 30.

An order entered pursuant to this section referring the matter to the State for filing of a petition to terminate parental rights is not a final, appealable order. In re Interest of Anthony R. et al., 264 Neb. 699, 651 N.W.2d 231 (2002).

Failure of the juvenile court to conduct an exception hearing pursuant to this section does not deny a parent due process of law. In re Interest of Clifford M. et al., 261 Neb. 862, 626 N.W.2d 549 (2001).